algorithm/arabic.sbl
// Checks
define Validate as (
    set should_stem
    // Check for English letters or numbers
    do repeat (
        [substring] among (
            // English letters (both cases)
            'a' 'b' 'c' 'd' 'e' 'f' 'g' 'h' 'i' 'j' 'k' 'l' 'm' 
            'n' 'o' 'p' 'q' 'r' 's' 't' 'u' 'v' 'w' 'x' 'y' 'z'
            'A' 'B' 'C' 'D' 'E' 'F' 'G' 'H' 'I' 'J' 'K' 'L' 'M' 
            'N' 'O' 'P' 'Q' 'R' 'S' 'T' 'U' 'V' 'W' 'X' 'Y' 'Z'
            // Numbers (both ASCII and normalized from Hindu-Arabic)
            '0' '1' '2' '3' '4' '5' '6' '7' '8' '9'
            (unset should_stem)
        )
        or next
    )
)

define Checks1 as (
    [substring] among (
        '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($(len > 4)  set is_noun  unset is_verb set is_defined)
        '{f}{a}{l}' ($(len > 4)  set is_noun  unset is_verb set is_defined)
        '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($(len > 3)  set is_noun unset is_verb set is_defined)
        '{w}{a}{l}' ($(len > 4)  set is_noun unset is_verb set is_defined)
        '{b}{b}' ($(len > 3)  set is_noun  unset is_verb)
        '{w}{w}' '{f}{f}' ($(len > 3)  set is_noun  unset is_verb)
    )
)

backwardmode (
		define Checks2 as (
		    [substring] among (
		        '{t_}' ($(len > 2) set is_noun  unset is_verb)
            '{a}{t}' ($(len > 3) set is_noun unset is_verb) // female plura
            '{t}{a}{n}' '{t}{y}{n}' ($(len >= 5) set is_noun unset is_verb)
		    )
		)
)
//prefixes
define Prefix_Step1 as (
         [substring] among (
             '{ao}{ao}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{ao}'  )
             '{ao}{a~}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{a~}'  )
             '{ao}{wo}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{ao}'  )
             '{ao}{a}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{a}'  )
             '{ao}{ao_}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{ao_}'  )
            // '{ao}' ($(len > 3) delete) //rare case
        )
)

define Prefix_Step2a as (
        [substring] among (
            '{f}{a}{l}' ($(len > 5) delete)
            '{w}{a}{l}' ($(len > 5) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step2b as (
        //not '{f}{a}'
        //not '{w}{a}'
        [substring] among (
            '{f}' ($(len > 3) delete)
            '{w}' ($(len > 3) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3a_Noun as ( // it is noun and defined
        [substring] among (
            '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($(len > 5) delete)
            '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($(len > 4) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3b_Noun as ( // probably  noun and defined
        not '{b}{a}' // exception
        [substring] among (
            '{b}' ($(len > 3) delete)
            '{k}'  ($(len > 4) delete) // BUG: cause confusion
            '{l}' ($(len > 4) delete) // BUG: cause confusion
            '{b}{b}' ($(len > 3) <-  '{b}'  )
            '{k}{k}'  ($(len > 3) <-  '{k}'  )
           )
)
define Prefix_Step3c_Noun as ( // probably  noun and undefined
        [substring] among (
            '{b}' ($(len > 4) delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3_Verb as (
        // س (sa-) prefix only attaches to present tense verbs
        // Present tense verbs start with: ي (y), ت (t), ن (n), أ (ao)
        [substring] among (
            '{s}{y}' ($(len > 4) is_verb <- '{y}' )
            '{s}{t}' ($(len > 4) is_verb <- '{t}')
            '{s}{n}' ($(len > 4) is_verb <- '{n}')
            '{s}{ao}' ($(len > 4) is_verb <- '{ao}')
        )
)

define Prefix_Step4_Verb as (
        [substring] among (
            // است patterns - indicates verb (often Form X)
            // است words tend to have longer roots, so adjust threshold
            '{y}{s}{t}' '{n}{s}{t}' '{t}{s}{t}' ($(len > 5) set is_verb unset is_noun <-  '{a}{s}{t}' )
            '{a}{s}{t}' ($(len > 5) set is_verb unset is_noun)
        )
)

// suffixes
backwardmode (

        define Suffix_Noun_Step1a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{y}' '{k}' '{e}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{k}{m}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{m}' ($(len >= 5)  delete)
                        '{k}{m}{a}' '{e}{m}{a}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step1b as (
            [substring] among (
                // جمع مذكر السالم (masculine sound plural) -ون/-ين
                // Rarely has roots less than 4, so use stricter length check
                // Single {n} requires len > 5 to leave at least 5 chars after removal
                '{n}' ($(len > 5) delete set is_noun unset is_verb)
                // Combined {w}{n}/{y}{n} are 2 chars, so require len > 6
                // Note: Also appears in verb suffixes but processed based on is_noun flag
                '{w}{n}' '{y}{n}' ($(len > 6) delete set is_noun unset is_verb)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{a}' '{y}' '{w}' ($(len > 4) delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2b as (
            [substring] among (
                // feminine plural ات is definitely a noun
                '{a}{t}' ($(len >= 5) delete set is_noun unset is_verb)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c1 as (
            [substring] among (
                '{t}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step2c2 as ( // feminine t_
            [substring] among (
                '{t_}' ($(len >= 3) delete)
                '{t}{a}{n}' '{t}{y}{n}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step3 as ( // ya' nisbiya
            [substring] among (
                '{y}' ($(len >= 3) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step1 as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{e}' '{k}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{y}' '{n}{a}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{m}' '{e}{n}' '{k}{m}' '{k}{n}' ($(len >= 5) delete)
                        '{e}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{a}' '{k}{m}{w}'($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Verb_Step2a as (
                [substring] among (
                        '{t}' ($(len >= 4)  delete)
                        '{a}' '{n}' '{y}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{t}{a}'  '{t}{n}'  ($(len >= 5) delete)// past
                        // present tense verb suffixes - maintain minimum length 4
                        // because present has 1-letter prefix
                        // Note: {w}{n}/{y}{n} also in noun suffixes but this processes
                        // when is_verb flag is set (verb suffixes processed first in 'or' chain)
                        '{a}{n}' '{w}{n}' '{y}{n}' ($(len > 5) delete set is_verb unset is_noun) // present
                        '{t}{m}{a}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Verb_Step2b as (
            [substring] among (
                '{w}{a}' '{t}{m}' ($(len >= 5) delete) // len >= 5
            )
        )


        define Suffix_Verb_Step2c as (
            [substring] among (
                '{w}' ($(len >= 4) delete)
                '{t}{m}{w}' ($(len >= 6) delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_All_alef_maqsura as (
            [substring] among (
                '{a_}' ( <- '{y}' ) // spell error
                // '{a_}' ( delete ) // if noun > 3
                // '{a_}' ( <- '{a}') // if verb
            )
        )
)

define stem as (
    // set initial values
    set is_noun
    set is_verb
    unset is_defined
    
    // validate word can be stemmed
    do Validate
    
    // only stem if validation passed
    should_stem (

        // guess type and properties
        do Checks1
        backwards ( do Checks2 )

        // normalization pre-stemming
        do Normalize_pre


        backwards (

           do (
                  //Suffixes for verbs
                (
               is_verb
               (
                   try
                   (
                      (
                        (atleast 1 Suffix_Verb_Step1)
                        ( Suffix_Verb_Step2a or Suffix_Verb_Step2c
                          or next
                          )
                      )
                      or Suffix_Verb_Step2b
                      or Suffix_Verb_Step2a
                    )
                    or Suffix_Verb_Step2a
                )
               )
               // Suffixes for nouns
              or (
                   is_noun
                    (

                       try (
                           Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
                           or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step1a (
                                  Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                                  or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                                  or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
                                  or next
                                  )
                              )
                           or (Suffix_Noun_Step1b (
                                  Suffix_Noun_Step2a
                                  or Suffix_Noun_Step2b
                                  or Suffix_Noun_Step2c1))
                           or (not is_defined Suffix_Noun_Step2a)
                           or (Suffix_Noun_Step2b)
                       )
                       (Suffix_Noun_Step3)
                     )
                )

                // Suffixes for alef maqsura
                or  Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
            )
        )

        //Prefixes
        do (
           try Prefix_Step1
           try ( Prefix_Step2a or Prefix_Step2b )
           ( Prefix_Step3a_Noun
             or (is_noun try Prefix_Step3b_Noun Prefix_Step3c_Noun)
             or (is_verb try Prefix_Step3_Verb Prefix_Step4_Verb)
             )
        )
        // normalization post-stemming
        do Normalize_post
    )
)
